Maryland, session 2025, SB0919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Audiologist” means an individual who practices audiology.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0919*

SENATE BILL 919
(q) (1) “Practice audiology” means to USE ANY MEANS KNOWN IN THE
SCIENCE OF AUDIOLOGY TO:
(i) Evaluate, diagnose, manage, and treat auditory or vestibular
conditions in the human ear;
(ii) Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or fit hearing aids to an
individual for the correction or relief of a condition for which hearing aids are worn;
(iii) Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or externally fit a sound
processor to an osseo–integrated device for the correction or relief of a condition for which
osseo–integrated devices are worn; and
(iv) Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or externally fit a sound
processor to a cochlear implant for the correction or relief of a condition for which cochlear
implants are worn.
(2) “Practice audiology” includes:
(i) The conducting of health screenings RELATED TO AUDITORY
OR VESTIBULAR CONDITIONS OR REQUIRED BY FEDERAL, STATE, OR THIRD–PARTY
PAYERS;
(ii) The removal of a foreign body from the external auditory canal
that is not impacted to the point it requires anesthesia;
(iii) The removal of cerumen from the external auditory canal that is
not impacted to the point it requires anesthesia;
(iv) The ordering of cultures and bloodwork testing as it relates to
the auditory or vestibular conditions in the human ear;
(v) The ordering and performing of in–office, nonradiographic
scanning or imaging of the external auditory canal AS IT RELATES TO THE AUDITORY OR
VESTIBULAR CONDITIONS IN THE HUMAN EAR; and
(vi) The ordering of radiographic imaging as it relates to the auditory
or vestibular conditions in the human ear.
(3) “Practice audiology” does not include:
(i) Surgery using an instrument, including a laser, a scalpel, a
needle, cautery, a cryoprobe, or a suture, in which human tissue is cut, burned, vaporized,
removed, or otherwise permanently altered by mechanical means, laser, ionizing radiation,
ultrasound, or other means;

SENATE BILL 919 3
(ii) Osseo–integrated device surgery;
(iii) Cochlear implant surgery; or
(iv) The preparation, operation, or performance of radiographic
imaging.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.